Tennessee, session 114, HB1107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "public high school" and substituting instead "public school, including a public charter
school,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) "Public charter school" has the same meaning as defined in § 49-13-104;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417(b), is amended by deleting
"Each LEA is authorized to" and substituting instead "Each LEA and public charter school shall"
and by inserting "regularly used by students in grades four through twelve (4-12)" immediately
after "all women's and girl's bathrooms and locker rooms".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
(c) The state shall reimburse each LEA and public charter school that provides
feminine hygiene products pursuant to this section in an amount equal to the cost of the
products paid by the LEA or public charter school pursuant to this section.
(d) The department of health shall collaborate with the state board of education,
and other state agencies as the department deems appropriate, to create a public health
campaign dedicated to encouraging individuals and nonprofit organizations to contribute
or drop off feminine hygiene products to eligible schools.
HB1107
002597
- 1 -

SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 002597